Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 455 Miscellaneous Criminal Practice Provisions

455.010,
455.020.
Trial of misdemeanor cases. [Recompiled.]

455.030.
Proceedings after judgment — Appeal. [Recompiled.]

455.040.
Magistrate to notify county attorney of trial or examining trial. [Repealed.]

455.050.
Felony docket to be called and trial dates fixed on last day of term. [Repealed.]

455.060.
Stolen, destroyed or lost indictment. [Repealed.]

455.070.
Dismissal or nolle prosequi; statement to be filed. [Repealed.]

455.080.
Information or warrant; when prosecution may be had on. [Repealed.]

455.090.
[Recompiled.]

455.100.
[Recompiled.]

455.110.
Witness before grand jury, how subpoenaed in vacation. [Repealed.]

455.120.
Process, execution of on Sunday. [Recompiled.]

455.130.
Infants, when to be excluded from courtroom. [Repealed.]

455.140.
Procedure for bringing federal prisoner to trial in state court on felony charge — Reimbursement of expenses.

The Commonwealth’s attorney may enter into an agreement with representatives of the federal government for conveyance of a federal prisoner to a Circuit Court of this state to stand trial therein on a felony charge, upon condition that such prisoner shall remain in the custody of an agent of the United States and be returned to the federal penitentiary for completion of the term of confinement there following conclusion of the trial in the Circuit Court, and thereafter to be returned to this state to serve any sentence imposed here. It may also be agreed that the state will bear the expense of such conveyance. The Commonwealth’s attorney shall then file in the Circuit Court his verified petition for writ of habeas corpus ad prosequendum stating facts as to the situation of the prisoner, the charge against him and date set for trial, the necessity of securing the prisoner for trial prior to his release in due course by federal authorities and the terms of the agreement which has been reached with such authorities. If the court deems the petition sufficient, it shall issue the writ and if the state is required to pay the expense the writ shall designate the officer to transport and guard the prisoner and such officer shall be reimbursed from the State Treasury for expenses incurred in the amount and manner provided in KRS 64.070(1); provided, however, that if a United States marshal or other federal official is designated by the court to transport and guard the prisoner such marshal or officer shall be reimbursed at the rate authorized by federal law or regulations. The Circuit Court shall enter an order of allowance of expenses for the officer upon conclusion of the trial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 48, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; 1976, ch. 24, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Interstate agreement on detainers, KRS

440.450

.

455.150.
Procedure for bringing material witness in state felony trial from federal prison — Reimbursement of expenses.

When a material witness for the Commonwealth in a felony prosecution pending in a court of this state is confined under judgment of conviction in any federal penal institution, the Commonwealth’s attorney may enter into an agreement with the appropriate federal authorities for conveyance of the witness at the expense of this state to the Circuit Court in which the trial is pending, and after trial, for return to the federal penitentiary. The Commonwealth’s attorney shall move the Circuit Court for an order for the attendance of the witness and shall state the situation of the prisoner, the date set for trial of the case, the importance of his testimony to the Commonwealth, and the agreement of the federal authorities to produce the prisoner in court. The Circuit Court shall designate the officer to transport and guard the prisoner and such person shall be reimbursed from the State Treasury for his expenses in the amount and manner provided in KRS 64.070(1); provided, however, that if a United States marshal or other federal official is designated by the court to transport and guard the prisoner such marshal or officer shall be reimbursed at the rate authorized by federal law or regulations. The Circuit Court shall enter an order of allowance of expenses for the officer upon conclusion of the trial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 48, § 2, effective June 16, 1960; 1976, ch. 24, § 2.

455.160.
Issuance of summons for violation of KRS 514.040.

In the event of a charge for a violation of KRS

514.040

with an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or less, a summons shall be issued prior to an arrest warrant. An arrest warrant shall not be issued until the person charged fails to respond to the summons, unless the issuing judge determines that, based upon previous offenses or charges, an arrest of the person is necessary in order to reasonably assure his or her appearance in court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 97, effective July 15, 1998.

455.170.
Electronic application for and issuance of search warrant — Conditions.

The Supreme Court of Kentucky may, by rule, authorize a process allowing a search warrant to be applied for and issued electronically if the process meets the requirements of Section 10 of the Kentucky Constitution, requires the production of a paper copy of the warrant at the time it is served, and otherwise complies with any other requirements for search warrants generally, including those pertaining to their filing, execution, and return.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 62, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

455.180.
Arrest or search warrant authorizing entry without notice — Requirements for issuance.

No arrest warrant or search warrant shall be issued authorizing entry without notice unless:

The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

The crime alleged is a crime that would qualify a person, if convicted, as a violent offender under KRS

439.3401

; the crime alleged is a crime designated in KRS

525.045

,

527.200

,

527.205

, or

527.210

; or the evidence sought may give rise to the charge of a crime that would qualify a person, if convicted, as a violent offender under KRS

439.3401

or may give rise to a charge of a crime designated in KRS

525.045

,

527.200

,

527.205

, or

527.210

; and

As established by facts specific to the case, giving notice prior to entry will endanger the life or safety of any person, or result in the loss or destruction of evidence sought that may give rise to a charge of a crime that would qualify a person, if convicted, as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401 or may give rise to a charge of a crime designated in KRS 525.045, 527.200, 527.205, or 527.210;

The law enforcement officer seeking the warrant has obtained the approval of his or her supervising officer, or has the approval of the highest ranking officer in his or her law enforcement agency;

The law enforcement officer seeking the warrant has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney for the jurisdiction for which the warrant is sought, or with an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney or assistant county attorney for the jurisdiction for which the warrant is sought;

The law enforcement officer seeking the warrant discloses to the judge, as part of the application, any other attempt to obtain a warrant authorizing entry without notice for the same premises, or for the arrest of the same individual;

The warrant authorizes that the entry without notice occur only between the hours of 6 a.m. and 10 p.m., except in exigent circumstances where the court makes the findings set forth in subsection (1) of this section and the court further finds by clear and convincing evidence that there are substantial and imminent risks to the health and safety of the persons executing the warrant, the occupants of the premises, or the public that justify the entry without notice occur during other hours designated by the court; and

If the warrant is not issued electronically pursuant to KRS

455.170

, the warrant includes the legibly printed name and signature of the judge.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 202, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

455.190.
Judicial review of application for warrant authorizing entry without notice.

A judge shall carefully review any application for a warrant pursuant to KRS

455.180

as a neutral and detached magistrate. Failure to act as a neutral and detached magistrate may be referred to the Judicial Conduct Commission.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 202, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

455.200.
Requirements for execution of warrant authorizing entry without notice.

A warrant issued pursuant to KRS

455.180

shall be executed:

By law enforcement officers who:

Are members of a special weapons and tactics team or special response team, or another established team or unit trained and tasked with resolving high-risk situations and incidents, who have received appropriate training in the execution of arrest and search warrants authorizing entry without notice. In counties having a population of less than ninety thousand (90,000), when, after reasonable inquiry by the law enforcement officer seeking the warrant, members of the special weapons and tactics team or special response team are not available to timely execute the warrant and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the risks to the health and safety of the persons executing the warrant, the occupants of the premises, or the public are greater if the warrant is not timely executed, the court may approve the execution of the warrant without members of a special weapons and tactics team or special response team;

Are equipped with body-worn cameras, or, in counties having a population of less than ninety thousand (90,000), equipped with other audio-visual or audio recording devices issued by the government, and shall record the entirety of the execution of the warrant with a recording device that meets the requirements of this paragraph; and

Are equipped with clearly visible insignia on any protective equipment or clothing that clearly identifies the name of the agency that employs the members of the special weapons and tactics team or special response team;

In the presence of a uniformed law enforcement officer; and

With a certified or licensed paramedic or emergency medical technician in proximity and available to provide medical assistance, if needed.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 202, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.